Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Local Option Elections

242.020.
Petition for election.

A petition for an election shall be signed by a number of constitutionally qualified voters of the territory to be affected, equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the votes cast in the territory at the last preceding general election. The petition may consist of one (1) or more separate units, and shall be filed with the county clerk in accordance with this section.

Before a petition for election may be presented for signatures, an intent to circulate the petition, including a copy of the unsigned petition, shall be filed with the county clerk by any person or group of persons seeking the local option election.

After a petition for a local option election has received no fewer than the number of qualifying signatures required by subsection (1) of this section, the signed petition shall be filed with the county clerk.

If the election is to be held on any day other than a primary or regular election date, a person or group of persons seeking the local option election shall post bond with the Circuit Court to cover all costs of the election within five (5) days after the signed petition is filed under paragraph (b) of this subsection. The cost of the election shall be established by the county judge/executive to determine the bond amount.

The petition for election, in addition to the signature and legibly printed name of each voter, shall state also the voter’s residence address, year of birth, and the correct date upon which the voter’s name was signed.

No signer of the petition may withdraw his or her name or have it taken from the petition after the petition has been filed. If the name of any person has been placed on the petition for election without that person’s authority, the person may appear before the county judge/executive before the election is ordered and upon proof that the person’s name was placed on the petition without his or her authority, the person’s name and personal information required in subsection (3) of this section shall be eliminated by an order of the county judge/executive. When the person’s name and personal information has been eliminated, he or she shall not be counted as a petitioner.

A petition seeking a local option election under this section shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages in (name of territory)?’”. No petition for a referendum shall be circulated for more than six (6) months prior to its filing.

After a petition for election has been filed in conformity with this section, the county judge/executive shall make an order on the order book of the court directing that the local option questions may be placed on the ballot for the next primary or regular election to be held in that territory. If the date of the local option election stated in the petition as provided in KRS 242.030(1) is a date other than a primary or regular election day, all election costs for such a local option election shall be borne by the person or group of persons who circulated the petition.

Substantial compliance with the wording designated under this chapter for a particular type of petition is sufficient to validate the actual wording of the petition.

History.

2554c-2, 2554c-3: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 374, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 112, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 48, § 87, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 63, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2013, ch. 121, § 7, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 190, § 1, effective April 11, 2017.

242.021.
Restriction on frequency of city’s request to increase quota retail licenses — Publication of notice of request — Contents of request — Burden on city to show that increase is necessary.

A city shall not file a request with the board seeking to increase the number of quota retail licenses for the city unless at least three (3) years have passed since the certification of its local option election approving alcohol sales.

Prior to making its request, the city shall publish a notice in the newspaper used for its legal notices, advising the general public of the city’s intent to request additional licenses from the board.

The request to the board for a quota increase shall include:

A certified copy of the governing body’s resolution approving the request;

A certified copy of the notice referenced in subsection (2) of this section; and

An explanation as to the reason the city meets the criteria established in KRS

241.069

for a quota increase.

The city shall bear the burden of showing an increase is necessary.

A city shall not petition the board for an increase more than once every three (3) years.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 154, § 6, effective April 14, 2018.

242.022.
Local option election for limited sales of alcoholic beverages by the drink at qualifying state park.

To promote economic development and tourism in any dry or moist county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, unified local government, or city, in which a state park is located, a local option election for the limited sales of alcoholic beverages by the drink may be held in a city, county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government, precinct where the state park’s qualifying lodge or golf course is located.

A petition seeking a local option election under this section shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election under KRS

242.022

on the following question: “‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at the state park located in (name of precinct)?’”.

A local option election for the limited sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink held under subsection (1) of this section shall be conducted in the same manner as specified in KRS

242.020

to

242.040

and

242.060

to

242.120

. The form of the proposition to be voted upon shall be “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at the state park located in the (name of precinct)?”.

When a majority of the votes cast at an election held under subsections (1) and (2) of this section are in favor of establishing moist territory, the entire state park shall become moist in the manner specified in KRS

242.200

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 20, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 19, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 190, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 62 and
190, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

242.030.
Date of local option election.

The date of the local option election shall be stated in the petition for the local option election.

The local option election shall be held not earlier than sixty (60) and not later than one hundred fifty (150) days after the date the petition is filed with the county clerk.

No local option election shall be held in the same territory more than once in every three (3) years.

In order for the local option election to be held on the day fixed by law for holding a primary, the petition shall be filed not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the day on which the primary is to be held and not later than the last Tuesday in January preceding the day fixed by law for holding the primary.

In order for the local option election to be held on the day fixed by law for a regular election, the petition shall be filed not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the day fixed by law for holding the regular election.

HISTORY:

2554c-4: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 47, § 2; 1978, ch. 384, § 375, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 121, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 20, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 190, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 62 and
190, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

242.040.
Advertisement of election.

Within five (5) days after the county judge/executive orders an election, the county clerk shall give to the sheriff a certified copy of the order. The sheriff shall have the order published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 in the county. When the election is ordered for the entire county, the sheriff shall also advertise the order by written or printed handbills posted at not less than five (5) conspicuous places in each precinct of the county for two (2) weeks before the election, and, when the election is ordered held in a city, district or precinct, at five (5) conspicuous places in each precinct therein for the same length of time. The sheriff shall report in writing to the county judge/executive that the notices have been published and posted.

History.

2554c-5: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 173; 1978, ch. 384, § 376, effective June 17, 1978.

242.050.
Form of proposition.

The proposition to be voted upon shall be stated without emblems and voters shall designate a “Yes” or a “No” vote. In any election the form of the proposition shall be, “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages in (name of county or city)?”.

History.

2554c-6: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 47, § 3; 1982, ch. 360, § 62, effective July 15, 1982.

242.060.
General election laws apply to elections — Cost.

The general election laws, including penalties for violations, shall apply to the election, except where these laws are inconsistent with this chapter.

The cost of the election shall be borne by the county.

History.

2554c-7, 2554c-8.

242.070.
Committee favoring or opposing local option proposition to certify challengers — Challengers entitled to same privileges and subject to same duties and penalties as challengers in other elections — Enforceability in Circuit Court and Court of Appeals.

Not more than twenty (20) days prior to an election held under this chapter, any group of citizens that in good faith favors or opposes the proposition to be submitted may file with the chair of the county board of elections a petition asking that it be recognized as the committee entitled to certify challengers. If more than one (1) group claims the right to certify challengers, the county board of elections shall promptly decide and publicly announce which committee is entitled to certify challengers. That decision shall not be final, but any aggrieved party may appeal to the county judge/executive, and upon hearing the county judge/executive shall determine which group shall be recognized.

Each committee is entitled to have up to two (2) challengers at each precinct during the holding of the election. Any group of citizens of the county may recommend to a committee a list of persons whom they desire to have appointed as challengers in each precinct in the county. If more than two (2) such lists are furnished, the committee, in making appointments of challengers, shall alternate between the several lists so furnished so as to give to each list an equal amount or proportion of the appointments. The committee shall not appoint more than one (1) challenger for any precinct from any one (1) list when multiple lists have been submitted. Any lists of challengers shall be presented to the committee within twenty (20) days after the local option petition is filed with the county clerk, and the committee or its chair shall make and certify the appointments and present a list of certified challengers to the county clerk at least twenty (20) days before the date on which the local option election will be held.

The appointment of challengers shall be certified in all respects as challengers at regular elections, except as otherwise provided in this section. The challengers shall be registered voters of the county in which the election is held and shall be subject to the same penalties and possess the same rights and privileges as challengers at regular elections, except that the challengers of one (1) committee may not challenge a person because the person offered to vote in a way favorable to the other committee.

The provisions of this section shall be enforceable against the chair of each committee by a mandatory summary proceeding instituted in the Circuit Court. The order of the court may be reviewed by the Court of Appeals as provided for the granting or dissolving of temporary injunctions.

The challengers shall perform their duties in the same manner and be subject to the same privileges as other challengers at an election including those provided in KRS

117.187

and

117.316

to

117.318

.

History.

2554c-9: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 219, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 377, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 360, § 63, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 48, § 88, effective July 13, 1990; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 8, effective June 25, 2013.

242.080.
Nomination of officers and issuance of certificates designating challengers, witnesses and guards. [Repealed.]

242.090.
Regular precinct officers to serve as local option precinct officers — Precinct election officers to be appointed under KRS 117.045 in years without scheduled elections or when local option election held before March 20.

The precinct election officers appointed for a primary and a regular election under KRS

117.045

shall serve as precinct election officers in local option elections. If a local option election is ordered to be held in a year in which there are no elections scheduled or prior to March 20 in a year in which elections are scheduled, precinct election officers shall be appointed in the manner provided under KRS

117.045

for special elections ordered to be held in a year in which there are no elections scheduled.

History.

2554c-11: amend. Acts 1990, ch. 48, § 90, effective July 13, 1990; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 9, effective June 25, 2013.

242.100.
Traffic in alcoholic beverage on election day local option election held prohibited. [Repealed.]

242.110.
Certification of results.

The result of the election shall be certified by the county board of elections. The certificate of the result shall be immediately filed with the county clerk and the county judge/executive shall have the certificate entered on the order book. The entry of the certificate, or an attested copy thereof, shall be prima facie evidence of the result of the election in actions under this chapter.

History.

2554c-12: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 378, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 48, § 91, effective July 13, 1990.

242.120.
Recounts and contests — Creation of recanvass procedures for local option elections — Recanvass reports.

Any qualified voter may demand a recount of the votes or contest the election in the same manner as is provided for the recount of votes or contest of regular elections of county officers by KRS

120.155

to

120.185

. The members of the county board of election commissioners shall be named as contestees and summons shall be served upon them. Any qualified voter may intervene as contestee by filing a petition to be made a party in the action.

The canvass and returns provided for in KRS

242.110

shall constitute the official returns for the local option election, unless before 4 p.m. on the seventh day following the local option election, the county clerk or county board of elections takes notice of a discrepancy in the tally of votes cast in any precinct or number of precincts within the territory voting in the local option election, or a committee favoring or opposing the proposition makes a written request to the county board of elections to check and recanvass the ballots cast, including absentee ballots, of any precinct or any number of precincts involving the local option election. After this time period has elapsed and notice is taken, the county board of elections shall assemble at 9 a.m. on the second day following the filing deadline to request a recanvass, and not sooner, and recheck and recanvass all voting equipment and make a proper return thereof to the county clerk, and the canvass and return shall become the official returns for the election.

In making the recanvass, the county board of elections shall make a record of the unique designation or number of the seal upon the voting equipment and, without unlocking the voting equipment against voting, recanvass the votes cast. If, after a recanvass, it is found that the original canvass of the returns has been correctly made from the voting equipment and that there still remains a discrepancy unaccounted for, this discrepancy shall be noted. If, upon recanvass, it appears that the original canvass of the returns by the election officers was incorrect, the returns and all papers being prepared by the county board of elections shall be corrected accordingly.

The county board of elections shall, immediately upon receipt of a request for a recanvass, notify the committees favoring or opposing the proposition of the time and place of the recanvass. At the recanvass, the committees favoring or opposing the proposition may be present. The county board of elections shall authorize representatives of the news media to observe the recanvass of the votes cast at the polls in each precinct. Nothing in this section shall prohibit an individual from requesting, in addition to a recanvass, a recount as authorized by KRS Chapter 120.

The State Board of Elections shall prescribe through administrative regulations promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A, a form to be used by county boards of election to report all recanvassed votes. The form shall include the following information:

The name of the county in which the recanvass was conducted;

The date of the report;

The date of the local option election;

The proposition for which the recanvass was conducted;

The names of the leaders of the committees favoring or opposing the proposition being recanvassed; and

The votes cast at the polls, absentee votes, and vote totals for each “yes” or “no” vote.

The report shall be signed by each member of the county board of elections.

The county board of elections shall file its recanvass report as prescribed in administrative regulations promulgated by the State Board of Elections in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish the proper procedures for conducting a local option election recanvass for each type of voting system approved by the State Board of Elections and in use in Kentucky.

History.

2554c-13: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 188, § 226, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 360, § 65, effective July 15, 1982; 2013, ch. 121, § 10, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 197, § 70, effective June 29, 2021.

242.123.
Local option election for limited sale of alcoholic beverages in precinct containing golf course — Petition language.

To promote economic development and tourism in any dry or moist county or city, a local option election for the limited sale of alcoholic beverages may be held in any precinct containing a nine (9) or an eighteen (18) hole golf course that meets United States Golf Association criteria as a regulation golf course.

A petition seeking a local option election under this section shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election under KRS

242.123

on the following question: “‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at a golf course or courses in the (name of precinct)?’”.

A local option election for the limited sale of alcoholic beverages authorized by subsection (1) of this section shall be held in accordance with KRS

242.020

to

242.040

, and

242.060

to

242.120

. The form of the proposition to be voted upon shall be: Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at a golf course or courses in the (name of precinct)?”.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 411, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 558, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 11, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 21, effective June 29, 2017.

242.1232.
Agreement of golf course to comply with the provisions of KRS Chapter 344. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

242.1238.
Limited sale precinct election for sale of alcoholic beverages at horse racetrack.

Other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, a limited sale precinct election may be held in any precinct containing a horse racetrack. Upon approval of the proposition, a Nonquota type 1 retail drink license may be issued in accordance with KRS

243.265

. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the issuance of any alcoholic beverage licenses other than for the premises of a horse racetrack pursuant to KRS

243.260

.

A petition seeking a local option election under this section shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: ‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages in (official name of the horse racetrack located in the designated precinct)?’”.

The question shall be presented to the voters in conformance with the requirements of KRS

242.050

, except that the form of the proposition shall be, “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages in (official name of the horse racetrack located in the designated precinct)?”.

The election shall be held in the precinct or precincts in the manner prescribed in this chapter. The election shall not be deemed to be an election in the “same territory” within the meaning of KRS 242.030(3).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 92, § 290, effective January 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 104, § 4, effective July 14, 2022.

242.1239.
Local option election for sale of alcoholic beverages by a microbrewery in the territory where the microbrewery is located or proposed.

In order to promote economic development and tourism, a dry or moist city, county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government may hold a local option election on the sale of alcoholic beverages by a microbrewery in the territory where the microbrewery is located or proposed.

A petition seeking a local option election under this subsection shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: ‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages at a microbrewery located in (name of precinct)?’”

The local option election shall be held in accordance with KRS

242.020

to

242.040

, and

242.060

to

242.120

. The form of the proposition to be voted upon shall be: “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages at a microbrewery located in (name of precinct)?” If the majority of the votes in an election held pursuant to this subsection are “Yes,” the precinct shall become moist in the manner specified in KRS

242.200

, and a nonquota type 4 retail malt beverage drink license and a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may be issued to a microbrewer located within the precinct.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 102, § 8, effective July 15, 2020.

242.124.
Limited sale precinct election for sale of wine at an existing or proposed small farm winery located in a dry territory.

If a licensed small farm winery is located in a dry or moist territory, the small farm winery shall remain dry or moist unless sales at the small farm winery are approved through a local option election held in accordance with the provisions of this section.

A local option election for the limited sale of alcoholic beverages may be held in a dry or moist city or county precinct where a small farm winery is located.

A petition seeking a local option election under this section shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: ‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages at a small farm winery or wineries located in (name of precinct)?’”.

A local option election for the limited sale of alcoholic beverages authorized by subsection (2) of this section shall be held in accordance with KRS

242.020

to

242.040

, and

242.060

to

242.120

. The form of the proposition to be voted upon shall be: “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages at a small farm winery or wineries located in (name of precinct)?”.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 22, effective June 29, 2017.

242.1241.
Limited sale precinct election for sale of alcoholic beverages on Sunday at licensed small farm winery in wet territory.

If the sale of alcoholic beverages is permitted at a licensed small farm winery located in a wet or moist territory, a limited sale precinct election may be held to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages on Sunday at the small farm winery.

A local option election authorized under this subsection shall be held in accordance with KRS

242.020

to

242.040

, and

242.060

to

242.120

.

The petition seeking a limited sale precinct election under this section shall state, “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: ‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages on Sunday at a small farm winery located in (name of precinct)?’”

If the precinct contains a licensed small farm winery, the proposition to be voted on in the limited sale precinct election shall state, “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages on Sunday at a licensed small farm winery or wineries located in (name of precinct)?”

A limited sale precinct election to authorize Sunday sales at a small farm winery may be held less than three (3) years after a local option election held in accordance with KRS

242.124

to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages at that small farm winery.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 115, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 23, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 102, § 7, effective July 15, 2020.

242.1242.
Local option election for limited sale of alcoholic beverages at qualified historic sites — Petition language.

To promote economic development and tourism in any dry or moist county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, unified local government, or city, in which a qualified historic site is located, a local option election for the limited sales of alcoholic beverages by the drink may be held in the precinct of the county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government where the qualified historic site is located, notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

A petition seeking a local option election under this section shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election under this section on the following question: ‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at qualified historic sites in (name of precinct)?’”.

A local option election for the limited sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink held under subsection (1) of this section shall be conducted in the same manner as specified in KRS

242.020

to

242.040

; and

242.060

to

242.120

. The form of the proposition to be voted upon shall be “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at qualified historic sites in the (name of precinct)?”.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 99, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 560, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 13, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 24, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 190, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 62 and
190, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

242.1243.
Local option precinct election for limited sale of alcoholic beverages at qualified distillery — Petition language.

To promote economic development and tourism in any dry or moist county or city in which a distillery is located, a local option election for the sale of alcoholic beverages may be held in a city or county precinct where the distillery is located, notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

A petition seeking a local option election under this section shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: ‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages at distilleries located in (name of precinct)?’”.

When a majority of the votes cast in an election held under subsections (1) and (2) of this section are in favor of establishing moist territory, the premises of the distilleries located in that precinct shall become moist in the manner specified in KRS

242.200

.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 80, § 26, effective July 15, 2016; 2020 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

242.1244.
Local option for limited sale of alcoholic beverages purchased in conjunction with a meal — Separate local option elections to be held for restaurants seating fifty persons and those seating one hundred persons.

In order to promote economic development and tourism, a dry or moist city, county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government may hold a local option election on the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at restaurants that seat a minimum of fifty (50) persons and derive a minimum of seventy percent (70%) of their food and alcoholic beverage receipts from the sale of food if alcoholic beverages are purchased in conjunction with a meal. A petition seeking a local option election under this subsection shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: ‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at restaurants with a seating capacity of at least fifty (50) persons and which derive at least seventy percent (70%) of their food and alcoholic beverage receipts from the sale of food if the alcoholic beverage is purchased in conjunction with a meal?’”.

The local option election shall be held in accordance with KRS

242.020

to

242.040

, and

242.060

to

242.120

. The form of the proposition to be voted upon shall be: Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink in (name of city or county) at restaurants with a seating capacity of at least fifty (50) persons and which derive at least seventy percent (70%) of their food and alcoholic beverage receipts from the sale of food if the alcoholic beverage is purchased in conjunction with a meal?”. If the majority of the votes in an election held pursuant to this subsection are “Yes,” licenses may be issued to qualified restaurants.

In order to promote economic development and tourism, a dry or moist city, county, urban-county government, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government may hold a local option election on the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink at restaurants and dining facilities which seat a minimum of one hundred (100) persons and derive a minimum of seventy percent (70%) of their food and alcoholic beverage receipts from the sale of food.

A petition seeking a local option election under this subsection shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: ‘Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink in (name of city or county) at restaurants and dining facilities with a seating capacity of at least one hundred (100) persons and which derive at least seventy percent (70%) of their food and alcoholic beverage receipts from the sale of food?’”.

The local option election shall be held in accordance with KRS

242.020

to

242.040

, and

242.060

to

242.120

. The form of the proposition to be voted upon shall be: Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink in (name of city or county) at restaurants and dining facilities with a seating capacity of at least one hundred (100) persons and which derive at least seventy percent (70%) of their food and alcoholic beverage receipts from the sale of food?”. If the majority of the votes in an election held pursuant to this subsection are “Yes,” licenses may be issued to qualified restaurants and dining facilities.

A local option proposition under subsection (1) of this section is a separate proposition than a local option proposition held under subsection (2) of this section, so that a separate limited local option election under each subsection is permitted. A territory may, by separate limited local option elections, simultaneously allow alcoholic beverage sales under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. A territory may also hold a limited local option election to allow alcoholic beverage sales under either subsection (1) or (2) of this section without authorizing alcoholic beverage sales under the other subsection.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 99, § 8, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 14, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 25, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 190, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 62 and
190, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

242.125.
Separate vote to determine wet, moist, or dry status in cities — Right of city precincts to vote for separate dry status — Dual status as both wet and moist.

A city shall not be deemed to be the “same territory” as that of a county within the meaning of KRS 242.030(3).A city shall have the right to determine its wet or dry status separate from a county’s wet or dry status.

A dry or moist city may hold a local option election to take the sense of the city residents for establishing the city as a wet territory. If the majority of the votes are in favor of establishing the city as a wet territory, the whole city shall become wet territory by application of KRS

242.200

. A moist city that becomes wet under this section shall retain its moist status and have dual status as both wet and moist.

Once a city becomes wet under this section separate from the county, a countywide local option election establishing the county as dry territory shall not cause the city to become dry territory.

Once a city becomes wet under this section separate from a county, a countywide local option election establishing the county as moist territory shall cause the city to have dual status as both wet and moist.

A wet city may hold a local option election to take the sense of the city residents for establishing the city as a dry or moist territory. If the majority of the votes are in favor of establishing the city as dry, the whole city shall become dry by application of KRS

242.190

. A wet city that becomes moist under this section shall retain its wet status and have dual status as both wet and moist.

If a city votes to become wet territory, a precinct of the city may hold a later election in conformity with this chapter to take the sense of the city precinct residents for establishing the city precinct as a dry or moist territory. If the majority of the votes are in favor of establishing the city precinct as a dry or moist territory, the city precinct shall become dry or moist territory by application of KRS

242.190

.

If a city precinct becomes dry or moist territory separate from a wet city, the city precinct may hold a later election in conformity with this chapter, to take the sense of the city precinct residents for reestablishing the city precinct as a wet territory. If the majority of the votes are in favor of reestablishing the city precinct as a wet territory, the city precinct shall become wet territory by application of KRS

242.200

.

A dry or moist county containing a wet city may hold a local option election to take the sense of the county residents for establishing the county as a wet territory. If the majority of the votes are in favor of establishing the county as a wet territory, the whole county shall become wet territory by application of KRS

242.200

.

A wet county containing a wet city by separate city election under this section may hold a local option election to take the sense of the county residents for establishing the county as a dry or moist territory. If the majority of the votes are in favor of establishing the county as a dry territory, the county territory outside the separately wet city limits shall become dry by application of KRS

242.190

. If the majority of the votes are in favor of establishing the county as moist territory, both the county and city shall retain their wet status and have dual status as both wet and moist.

Residents of any city, including a separately wet city, are residents of the county, and shall therefore be permitted to sign any petitions for, and vote in, county local option elections.

A petition seeking a wet local option election under this section shall state “We the undersigned registered voters hereby petition for an election on the following question: “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages in (name of county, city, or precinct)?”.

In any wet local option election under this section, the form of the proposition to be voted upon shall be: “Are you in favor of the sale of alcoholic beverages in (name of county, city, or city precinct)?”.

The status of any moist territory approving limited alcoholic beverage sales through a previous election held under KRS

242.022

,

242.123

,242.1238,

242.124

,

242.1242

,

242.1243

,

242.1244

, and

242.1292

, or any other limited local option election, shall not be affected by any outcome of any wet election held under this section. A territory’s wet or moist status may only be changed to dry status by a local option election in which the majority of the votes are not in favor of the original same wet or moist election proposition.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 47, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 213; 1982, ch. 360, § 66, effective July 15, 1982; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 15, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 27, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 26, effective June 29, 2017.

242.126.
Effect on local option status of a county if urban-county government adopted.

The adoption of urban-county government by a county when the local option status of the county is different from any of the cities contained therein shall not affect the local option status of the county or any of the cities contained therein. The territorial boundaries in the county shall survive the adoption of urban-county government for purposes of an election pursuant to KRS

242.125

. The adoption of urban-county government shall not impede or affect the right of a county or city contained therein to determine its own local option status.

No part of this section shall apply to any urban-county government established prior to July 13, 1990.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 135, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2014, ch. 92, § 292, effective January 1, 2015.

242.127.
Sale of distilled spirits or wine by the drink in wet city with population of 3,000 to 7,999 — Local option election. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 96, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

242.129.
Statement of proposition submitted in election. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 96, § 2; 1982, ch. 360, § 67, effective July 15, 1982; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.